Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201986-1242
Disputes; court jurisdiction; rates; applicability.

A court of competent jurisdiction shall have jurisdiction to determine all disputes arising under the Small Wireless Facilities Deployment Act. Pending resolution of a dispute concerning rates for collocation of small wireless facilities on authority poles, the rates listed in section 86-1239 shall apply.

Laws 2019, LB184, § 42.